New York, session 2025-2026, A7805.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The tax law is amended by adding a new article 15 to read 2 as follows: 3 ARTICLE 15 4 TAX ON DIGITAL ADS 5 Section 330. Findings and intent. 6 331. Definitions. 7 332. Imposition of tax. 8 333. Returns. 9 334. Tax payment. 10 § 330. Findings and intent. The legislature finds and declares the 11 following: 12 1. Many goods and services that have been traditionally subject to 13 state and local sales use taxes have avoided taxation in the digital 14 era. However, many digital transactions are harder to bring into the 15 sales tax base because instead of paying a monetary fee, customers some- 16 times barter their personal information for access to digital platforms. 17 This personal information is in turn sold for use in targeted advertise- 18 ments on digital platforms. To tax this consumption, leading tax econo- 19 mists have suggested using the receipts earned from digital advertise- 20 ments as a proxy for the value of the barter. 21 2. As has been noted by many, including the Organization for Economic 22 Co-operation and Development, the value of the consumption provided by 23 digital platforms is typically greater as the size of its network is 24 greater. The legislature finds that the consumption value provided by EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD02007-01-5 A. 7805 2 1 networks of a small size is negligible, especially when compared to the 2 compliance burden that would be imposed on smaller digital platforms. 3 § 331. Definitions. As used in this article, the following terms shall 4 have the following meanings: 5 1. The term "annual gross revenues" means income or revenue from all 6 sources in New York state, before any expenses or taxes, computed 7 according to generally accepted accounting principles. 8 2. The term "assessable base" means the annual gross revenues derived 9 from digital advertising services in the state. 10 3. The term "digital advertising services" includes advertisement 11 services on a digital interface, including advertisements in the form of 12 banner advertising, search engine advertising, interstitial advertising, 13 and other comparable advertising services, that use personal information 14 about the people the ads are being served to. 15 4. The term "digital interface" means any type of software, including 16 a website, part of a website, or application, that a user is able to 17 access. 18 5. (a) The term "person" means any natural individual, receiver, trus- 19 tee, guardian, personal representative, fiduciary, or representative of 20 any kind and any partnership, firm, association, corporation, or other 21 entity. 22 (b) The term "person", unless expressly provided otherwise, does not 23 include a governmental entity or a unit or instrumentality of a govern- 24 mental entity. 25 6. The term "user" means an individual or any other person who 26 accesses a digital interface with a device. 27 § 332. Imposition of tax. 1. There is hereby imposed and shall be paid 28 a tax on the annual gross revenues any person derives from digital 29 advertising services in the state. 30 2. The tax imposed shall be apportioned to the state by the apportion- 31 ment factor determined pursuant to this section. The apportionment 32 factor is a fraction, determined by including only those receipts, net 33 income, net gains, and other items described in this section that are 34 included in the computation of the taxpayer's business income for the 35 taxable year. The numerator of the apportionment fraction shall be equal 36 to the sum of all the amounts required to be included in the numerator 37 pursuant to the provisions of this section and the denominator of the 38 apportionment fraction shall be equal to the sum of all the amounts 39 required to be included in the denominator pursuant to the provisions of 40 this section. 41 3. (a) The annual gross revenues of a person derived from digital 42 advertising in the state shall be included in the numerator of the 43 apportionment fraction. The annual gross revenues of a person derived 44 from digital advertising in the United States shall be included in the 45 denominator of the apportionment fraction. 46 (b) The commissioner shall adopt regulations to determine the amount 47 of revenue derived from each state in which digital advertising services 48 are provided. 49 4. The digital advertising gross revenues tax rate is seven percent of 50 the assessable base for a person with annual gross revenues derived from 51 digital advertising in the state exceeding one hundred million dollars. 52 § 333. Returns. 1. Each person that, in a calendar year, has annual 53 gross revenues derived from digital advertising services in the state of 54 at least one million dollars shall complete, under oath, and file with 55 the commissioner a return, on or before April fifteenth the year follow- 56 ing the effective date of this article. A. 7805 3 1 2. (a) Each person that reasonably expects the person's annual gross 2 revenues derived from digital advertising services in the state to 3 exceed one million dollars shall complete, under oath, and file with the 4 commissioner a declaration of estimated tax, on or before April 5 fifteenth of that year. 6 (b) Any person required to file a declaration of estimated tax for a 7 taxable year pursuant to paragraph (a) of this subdivision, shall 8 complete and file with the commissioner a quarterly estimated tax return 9 on or before June fifteenth, September fifteenth, and December fifteenth 10 of such year. 11 3. Any person required to file a return pursuant to this section shall 12 file with the return an attachment that states any information that the 13 commissioner requires to determine annual gross revenues derived from 14 digital advertising services in the state. 15 4. Any person required to file a return under subdivision two of this 16 section shall maintain records of digital advertising services provided 17 in the state and the basis for the calculation of the digital advertis- 18 ing gross revenues tax owed. 19 § 334. Tax payment. 1. Except as provided in subdivision two of this 20 section, each person required to file a return under section three 21 hundred thirty-three of this article shall pay the digital advertising 22 gross revenues tax with the return that covers the period for which the 23 tax is due. 24 2. Any person required to file estimated digital advertising gross 25 revenues tax returns under paragraph (b) of subdivision two of section 26 three hundred thirty-three of this article shall pay: 27 (a) at least twenty-five percent of the estimated digital advertising 28 gross revenues tax shown on the declaration or amended declaration for a 29 taxable year: 30 i. With the declaration or amended declaration that covers the year; 31 and 32 ii. With each quarterly return for that year; and 33 (b) any unpaid digital advertising gross revenues tax for the year 34 shown on the person's return that covers that year with the return. 35 § 2. The tax law is amended by adding a new section 1816 to read as 36 follows: 37 § 1816. Digital ad tax. Any willful act or omission by any person 38 which constitutes a violation of any provision of article fifteen of 39 this chapter shall constitute a misdemeanor. 40 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately and shall apply to taxable 41 years beginning on and after January 1, 2026.